West Virginia, session 2026, HB4767.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Medicaid Manual. (a) The Bureau for Medical Services shall prepare, compile, and file its complete policy manual as a legislative rule in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code.(b) The bureau shall file the legislative rule required under subsection (a) with the Secretary of States’ office on or before July 1, 2026.(c) Following the initial filing required, the bureau shall file all subsequent amendments, supplements, and revisions to its policy manual as legislative rules in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code.(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the bureau from issuing internal guidance or emergency procedures as necessary; however, any such guidance that remains in effect for more than 180 days shall be incorporated into the legislative rule process, and filed as an emergency rule. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home